Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.080

Codefendants.

If the service member or his or her dependent is a codefendant with others who are not in military service and who are not entitled to the relief and protections provided under this chapter, the plaintiff may proceed against those other defendants with the approval of the court.

[ 2005 c 254 s 8.]